Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 35 Military Justice
35.802.
Authority to administer oaths and to act as notary.

The following persons may administer oaths for the purposes of military administration, including military justice:

All judge advocates;

All adjutants, assistant adjutants, acting adjutants, and personnel adjutants;

All commanding officers of the naval militia; and

All other persons designated by regulations of the Armed Forces of the United States or by statute.

The following persons may administer oaths necessary in the performance of their duties:

The president, military judge, and trial counsel for all general and special courts-martial;

The president and the counsel for the court of any court of inquiry;

All officers designated to take a deposition;

All persons detailed to conduct an investigation;

All other persons designated by regulations of the Armed Forces of the United States or by statute.

The signature without seal of any such person, together with the title of his or her office, shall be prima facie evidence of the person’s authority.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 140, effective June 25, 2013.

35.805.
Sections to be explained.

The sections of this code specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection shall be carefully explained to each enlisted member at the time of, or within thirty (30) days after, the member’s initial entrance into a duty status with the state military forces.

The sections shall be explained again:

After the member has completed basic or recruit training; and

Again at the time when the member reenlists.

This subsection applies with respect to KRS

35.015

,

35.020

,

35.035

to

35.070

,

35.120

,

35.130

,

35.155

,

35.185

,

35.190

,

35.275

,

35.440

to

35.730

, and

35.805

to

35.810

.

The text of this code and of the regulations prescribed under such code shall be made available to any member of the state military forces, upon request by the member, for the member’s personal examination.

History.

Repealed, reenact, and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 141, effective June 25, 2013.

35.807.
Complaints of wrongs.

Any member of the state military forces who believes himself or herself wronged by his or her commanding officer, and, upon due application to that commander, is refused redress, may complain to any superior commissioned officer who shall forward the complaint to the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the officer against whom it is made. The officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction shall examine into the complaint and take proper measures for redressing the wrong complained of, and shall, as soon as possible, send to the adjutant general a true statement of that complaint, with the proceedings thereon.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 142, effective June 25, 2013.

35.810.
Redress of injuries to property.

Whenever complaint is made to any commanding officer that willful damage has been done to the property of any person or that the person’s property has been wrongfully taken by members of the state military forces, that person may, under such regulations prescribed, convene a board to investigate the complaint. The board shall consist of from one (1) to three (3) commissioned officers and, for the purpose of that investigation, it has power to summon witnesses and examine them upon oath, to receive depositions or other documentary evidence, and to assess the damages sustained against the responsible parties. The assessment of damages made by the board is subject to the approval of the commanding officer, and in the amount approved by that officer shall be charged against the pay of the offenders. The order of such commanding officer directing charges herein authorized is conclusive on any disbursing officer for the payment to the injured parties of the damages so assessed and approved.

If the offenders cannot be ascertained, but the organization or detachment to which they belong is known, charges totaling the amount of damages assessed and approved may be made in such proportion as may be considered just upon the individual members thereof who are shown to have been present at the scene at the time the damages complained of were inflicted, as determined by the approved findings of the board.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 143, effective June 25, 2013.

35.812.
Delegation by the Governor.

The Governor may delegate any authority vested in the Governor under this code, and provide for the subdelegation of any such authority, except the power given the Governor by KRS

35.105

.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 144, effective June 25, 2013.

35.815.
Payment of fees, costs, and expenses.

The fees and authorized travel expenses of all witnesses, experts, victims, court reporters, and interpreters, fees for the service of process, the costs of collection, apprehension, detention and confinement, and all other necessary expenses of prosecution and the administration of military justice, not otherwise payable by any other source, shall be paid out of the military justice fund.

For the foregoing purposes, there is created in the State Treasury a fund to be designated the military justice fund that shall be administered by the adjutant general, from which expenses of military justice shall be paid in the amounts and manner as prescribed by law. The legislature may appropriate and have deposited in the military justice fund such funds as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this code.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 145, effective June 25, 2013.

35.817.
Payment of fines and disposition thereof.

Fines imposed by a military court or through imposition of non-judicial punishment may be paid to the state and delivered to the court or imposing officer, or to a person executing their process. Fines may be collected by:

Cash or money order;

Retention of any pay or allowances due or to become due the person from any state or the United States; or

Garnishment or levy, together with costs, on wages, goods, and chattels of a person delinquent in paying a fine, as provided by law.

Any sum so received or retained shall be deposited in the military justice fund or to whomever the court so directs.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 146, effective June 25, 2013.

35.820.
Uniformity of interpretation.

This code shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make it uniform, so far as practical, with the Uniform Code of Military Justice, 10 U.S.C. Chapter 47.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 147, effective June 25, 2013.

35.822.
Immunity for action of military courts.

All persons acting under the provisions of this code, whether as a member of the military or as a civilian, shall be immune from any personal liability for any of the acts or omissions which they did or failed to do as part of their duties under this code.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 148, effective June 25, 2013.

35.825.
Severability.

The provisions of this code are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this code or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this code.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 149, effective June 25, 2013.

35.827.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Kentucky Code of Military Justice.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 150, effective June 25, 2013.

35.830.
Supersedes existing state military justice codes.

Upon June 25, 2013, this chapter supersedes all existing statutes, ordinances, directives, rules, regulations, orders, and other laws in the state covered by the subject matter of this chapter, and all such statutes, ordinances, directives, rules, regulations, orders, and other laws are hereby superseded.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 151, effective June 25, 2013.